Utah statutes.
16-16-509.   Waiver of members meeting notice.
(1)  A member may waive notice of a members meeting before, during, or after
the meeting.
(2)  A member's participation in a members meeting is a waiver of notice of
that meeting unless the member objects to the meeting at the beginning of the
meeting or promptly upon the member's arrival at the meeting and does not
thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.
